Maine, session 132, LD2041.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. P&SL 1951, c. 107, §9, first sentence, as amended by P&SL 2003, c. 10,
§1, is further amended to read:
For accomplishing the purposes of this act, the district, through its trustees, is authorized
to borrow money from time to time, not exceeding $900,000 $15,000,000 and to issue
therefor the interest-bearing negotiable notes or bonds of the district, maturing serially or
otherwise, and to make subsequent renewals of the same in whole or in part, and for said
purposes and for the purpose of refunding any notes, bonds or other lawful indebtedness,
to establish a fund therefor, and for the purpose of obtaining or providing money to pay or
to meet any necessary expenses and liabilities incurred or assumed under the provisions of
this act, including expenses in the creation of this district, in securing sources of supply,
taking water and land, paying damages, laying pipes, constructing, maintaining and
operating a water plant and making extensions, additions and improvements to the same,
the district, through its trustees, may, from time to time, issue bonds of the district to an
amount necessary in the judgment of the trustees therefor, maturing at 1 one time or in
Page 1 - 132LR2604(03)

uniform or varying installments, with or without call provisions and at such rates of interest
and on such terms and conditions as the trustees determine.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2604(03)